Utah statutes.
35A-8-1004.   Duties of office.

The office shall:

(1)  coordinate state activities designed to reduce poverty;

(2)  encourage entities in the private sector to participate in efforts to ameliorate poverty in the community;

(3)  cooperate with agencies of local, state, and the federal government in reducing poverty and implementing community, social, and economic programs;

(4)  receive and expend funds for the purposes outlined in this part;

(5)  enter into contracts with and award grants to public and private nonprofit agencies and organizations;

(6)  develop a state plan based on needs identified by community action agencies and community action statewide organizations;

(7)  designate community action agencies to receive funds through the Community Services Block Grant program;

(8)  fund community action agencies and community action statewide organizations;

(9)  make rules in conjunction with the division in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to carry out the purposes of this part;

(10)  provide assistance to local governments or private organizations for the purpose of establishing and operating a community action agency;

(11)  provide technical assistance to community action agencies to improve program planning, program development, administration, and the mobilization of public and private resources;

(12)  convene public meetings that provide citizens the opportunity to comment on public policies and programs to reduce poverty;

(13)  advise the governor and Legislature of the nature and extent of poverty in the state and make recommendations concerning changes in state and federal policies and programs;

(14)  encourage Utah's nonprofit humanitarian assistance agencies serving low-income persons by facilitating, coordinating, training, and providing technical assistance to address the needs of Utah's low-income persons by enhancing management, improving service and program delivery, facilitating partnerships, and preserving flexibility and local initiative;

(15)  develop and implement management goals that fulfill the Community Services Block Grant mission, state requirements, and the mandates of federal legislation;

(16)  prepare a Community Services Block Grant plan that contains provisions describing how the state will carry out the assurances of the Community Services Block Grant Act;

(17)  act as the state agency responsible for the evaluation and improvement of emergency food assistance services in the state;

(18)  monitor the impact of social policies on the emergency food network;

(19)  provide training and technical assistance to grantees to assist their:

(a)  program development and implementation;

(b)  compliance with state and federal regulations; and

(c)  reporting and management information systems;

(20)  make the distributions required by Section 35A-8-1009; and

(21)  administer other programs to alleviate poverty that are assigned to the office.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

